Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 16

Automated Teller Machines

45-16-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Electronic terminal” means an electronic device through which a person may initiate an electronic fund transfer to access the person's deposit, share, or other accounts or credit facility, and includes, but is not limited to, automated teller machines, cash dispensing machines, point of sale terminals, or other cash, debit, stored value, script, or cash equivalent device;

“Financial institution” means a state or national bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union that owns or operates an electronic terminal;

“Foreign access card” means any card or other device eligible for use in an electronic terminal where the foreign access card is not issued to the user by the owner or operator of the electronic terminal;

“Shared electronic network” means any system by which a person may initiate any financial transaction from an electronic terminal owned or operated by any person other than a financial institution with whom the person has a deposit, share, or other account or credit facility; and

“Usage fee” is any fee charged by the owner or operator of an electronic terminal on transactions by a holder of a foreign access card.

Acts 1996, ch. 899, § 1.

45-16-102. Usage fees authorized.

An agreement to share electronic terminals or participate in a shared electronic network shall not prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of a financial institution to charge a usage fee for use of its electronic terminals, require a financial institution to limit or waive its rights or obligations under this section, or require the financial institution to otherwise distinguish or discriminate on classes or types of transactions. This section shall not limit or restrict any other fee that a financial institution may impose on its customers pursuant to any deposit, lending, or other written agreement that it has with a customer, or to any other transaction where a customer has no written agreement, but which a customer has notice of the fee.

Acts 1996, ch. 899, § 1.

45-16-103. Usage fees on foreign access cards.

A financial institution may impose and collect a usage fee on a foreign access card; provided, that the usage fee may only be charged if the imposition of the fee is disclosed at a time and in a manner that allows the user to terminate or cancel the transaction without incurring the usage fee.

Acts 1996, ch. 899, § 1.

45-16-104. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of financial institutions is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1996, ch. 899, § 2.